Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 15. Joint municipal electric power.

§ 77-5-701.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Joint Municipal Electric Power and Energy Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-703.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature of the State of Mississippi hereby finds and determines that:

A critical situation exists with respect to the present and future supply of electric power and energy in the State of Mississippi;

The cost of energy either purchased at wholesale or generated by said electrical utilities has caused the cost of electricity to consumers to increase dramatically during the past few years;

Many municipalities in the state have for many years owned and operated systems for the generation and/or distribution of electric power and energy to customers in their respective areas and are empowered severally to engage in the generation and transmission of electric power and energy.

Such municipalities owning electric generation and/or distribution systems have an obligation to provide their inhabitants and customers the most adequate, reliable and economical source of electric power and energy in the future that may be available to them;

In order to achieve the economies and efficiencies made possible by the proper planning, acquisition, construction, financing, sizing and location of facilities for the generation and/or transmission of electric power and energy which may not be practical for any municipality acting alone, and to insure an adequate, reliable and economical supply of electric power and energy to the people of the state, it is desirable for the State of Mississippi to authorize municipal electric systems and/or joint agencies created pursuant to this article to jointly or severally plan, acquire, construct, finance, develop, own, operate and maintain electric generation and/or transmission facilities with each other, or any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy within this state or any other state, all as may be appropriate to their needs in order to provide for their present and future power requirement for all uses without supplanting or displacing the service at retail of other electric suppliers operating in the state; and

The joint planning, financing, development, ownership and operation of electric generation and/or transmission facilities by municipalities which own electric generation and/or distribution systems or by joint agencies created pursuant to this article and the issuance of revenue bonds for such purposes as provided in this article is for public use and for public and municipal purposes and is a means of achieving economies, adequacy and reliability in the generation and/or transmission of electric power and energy and the meeting of future needs of the state and its inhabitants.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-705.
Definitions.

The following terms, whenever used or referred to in this article, shall have the following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Bonds” shall mean electric revenue bonds, notes and other evidences of indebtedness of a joint agency or municipality issued under the provisions of this article and shall include refunding bonds.

“Cost” or “cost of a project” shall mean, but shall not be limited to, all costs of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment or extension of any project, including the cost of studies, plans, specifications, surveys and estimates of costs and revenues relating thereto; all costs of land, land rights, rights-of-way and easements, water rights, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, certificates, franchises, and the preparation of applications for and securing the same; administrative, organizational, legal, engineering and inspection expenses; financing fees, expenses and costs; working capital; initial and reload fuel costs; all machinery and equipment including construction equipment; interest on the bonds during the period of construction and for such reasonable period thereafter as may be determined by the issuing municipality or joint agency; establishment of reserves; and all other expenditures of the issuing municipality or joint agency incidental, necessary or convenient to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment or extension of any project and the placing of the same in operation.

“Governing authorities” shall mean the legislative body, council, board of commissioners, board of aldermen, or other body charged by law with governing the municipality.

“Governing board” shall mean the legislative body, council, board of trustees, board of commissioners or other body charged by law with governing the municipality or joint agency.

“Utility commission” shall mean the legislative body, board of commissioners, utility commission or body charged by law with the control, management and operation of an electric generation, transmission or distribution system, including the board of commissioners of a joint agency organized pursuant to this article.

“Joint agency” shall mean a public body and body corporate and politic organized in accordance with the provisions of this article.

“Municipality” shall mean a city, town or other unit of municipal government created under the laws of the state, or any board, agency or commission thereof, including a joint agency organized pursuant to this article, owning a system or facilities for the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy for public and private uses.

“Project” shall mean any system, facilities, land, works, real property, and/or personal property of every kind or nature now or hereafter existing, or under construction for the generation, transmission and transformation, or any of them, of electric power and energy by any means whatsoever including, but not limited to, any one or more electric generating units, transmission or transformation facilities, or any facility or any facilities for the development, production, manufacture, procurement, handling, storage, fabrication, enrichment, processing or reprocessing of fuel of any kind or any facility or rights with respect to the supply of water which may be used or useful in the acquisition, development or supply of electric power and energy, or any interest in the foregoing, whether an undivided interest as a tenant in common or otherwise.

“State” shall mean the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1981).

§ 77-5-707.
Powers of municipality; determining power and energy needs; filing of determination.

In addition and supplemental to the powers otherwise conferred on municipalities by the laws of the state, and in order to accomplish the purposes of this article and to obtain a supply of electric power and energy for the present and future needs of its inhabitants and customers, a municipality may plan, finance, develop, construct, reconstruct, acquire, improve, enlarge, better, own, operate and maintain an undivided interest as a tenant in common in a project situated within or without the state jointly with one or more other municipalities, or with a joint agency created pursuant to this article, or with municipal corporations or political subdivisions of other states (to the extent permitted by the laws of such other states), or with any other federal, state or municipal agency which owns electric generation, transmission or distribution facilities or with any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy either within or without this state, and may make such plans and enter into such contracts in connection therewith, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, as are necessary or appropriate.

Prior to acquiring any such undivided interest, the utility commission shall determine the needs of the municipality for power and energy based upon engineering studies and reports, and shall not acquire an undivided interest as a tenant in common in a project in excess of that amount of capacity and the energy associated therewith required to provide for its projected needs for power and energy from and after the date the project is estimated to be placed in normal continuous operation and for such reasonable period of time thereafter as shall be determined by the utility commission. In determining the future power requirements of a municipality, there shall be taken into account the following:

The economies and efficiencies estimated to be achieved in acquiring, constructing and operating the proposed facilities for the generation and transmission of electric power and energy;

The municipality’s estimated requirements for power and energy from the project and for reserve capacity and to meet obligations under pooling and reserve sharing agreements reasonably related to its needs for power and energy to which it is or may become a party; and

The cost of existing or alternative power supply sources.

A determination by such utility commission approved by the governing authorities as herein provided, based upon appropriate findings of the foregoing matters, shall be conclusive as to the quantity of the interest which a municipality may acquire in a project. Any determination by the utilities commission shall be filed with the governing authorities of the municipality and recorded in the official minutes of the governing authorities. Notice of the filing of such determination shall be published one (1) time in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality, and shall specify a date, not less than ten (10) days after the publication of such notice at which the governing authorities of such municipality shall meet to hear any objections or remonstrances that may be made. At said meeting, the governing authorities shall consider the objections or protests, if any, and shall at said meeting or at any adjourned meeting, ratify or reject the determination of the utility commission. Any person or party objecting or protesting the determination at said meeting, who is aggrieved by the ratification thereof, shall file an appeal pursuant to Section 11-51-75.

Nothing herein contained shall prevent a municipality or municipalities from undertaking studies to determine whether there is a need for a project or whether such project is feasible.

For the purposes of this section, the terms “municipality” and “utility commission” shall not include a joint agency or the board of commissioners thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 4; Laws, 1981, ch. 379, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1981).

§ 77-5-709.
Proportionate ownership of undivided interest in projects; liability of municipality; contracts; issuance of bonds.

Each municipality shall own an undivided interest in any project in proportion to the amount of the money furnished the value of property or other consideration supplied by it for the planning, development, acquisition or construction thereof, and shall be entitled to a percentage share of the output and capacity therefrom equal to such undivided interest.

Each municipality shall be severally liable for its own acts and not jointly or severally liable for the acts, omissions or obligations of others, and no money or property or other consideration supplied by any municipality shall be credited or otherwise applied to the account of any other municipality or other tenant in common in the project, nor shall the undivided share of any municipality in a project be charged directly or indirectly with any debt or obligation of any other municipality or other tenant in common or be subject to any lien as a result thereof. The acquisition of a project shall include, but shall not be limited to, the purchase or lease of an existing, completed project and the purchase of a project under construction. A municipality participating in the joint planning, financing, construction, reconstruction, acquisition, improvement, enlargement, betterment, ownership, operation or maintenance of any project under this article may furnish money and provide property, both real and personal, services and other considerations derived solely from the proceeds of bonds or from the ownership and operation of its electric system, or both.

Any contracts entered into by municipalities with respect to joint ownership in a project shall contain such terms, conditions and provisions, not inconsistent with the provisions hereof, as the utility commission of the municipalities shall deem to be in the interests of the municipalities and shall be spread upon the minutes of said utility commission. Any such contracts shall be ratified by resolution of the governing authorities of each municipality spread upon its minutes. Any such contracts shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The purpose or purposes of the contract;

The duration of the contract;

The manner of appointing or employing the personnel necessary in connection with the project;

The method of financing the project, including the apportionment of costs and revenues;

Provisions specifying the ownership interests of the parties in real property used or useful in connection with the project, and the procedures for the disposition of such property when the contract expires, is terminated or when the project, for any reason, is abandoned, decommissioned or dismantled;

Provisions relating to alienation and prohibiting partition of a municipality’s undivided interest in a project, which provisions shall not be subject to any provision of law restricting covenants against alienation or partition;

Provisions for the construction of a project, which may include the determination that one (1) municipality jointly participating or any person, firm or corporation may construct the project as agent for all the parties;

Provisions for the operation and maintenance of a project, which may include the determination that one (1) municipality jointly participating or any person, firm or corporation may operate and maintain the project as agent for all the parties;

Provisions for the creation of a committee of representatives of the parties jointly participating with such powers of supervision of the construction and operation of the project as the contract, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, may provide;

Provisions that if one or more of the parties shall default in the performance or discharge of its or their obligations with respect to the project, the other party or one or more of the other parties may assume, pro rata, or otherwise, the obligations of such defaulting party or parties and may succeed to such rights and interests of the defaulting party or parties in the project as may be agreed upon in the contract;

Methods of amending the contract;

Methods for terminating the contract; and

Any other necessary or proper matter.

For the purpose of paying its respective share of the cost of a project or projects, a municipality may issue its bonds as provided in this article, and, notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, may pledge to the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on such bonds, the revenues or any portion thereof derived or to be derived from the ownership and operation of its system or facilities for the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power or energy or its interest in any joint project or projects, or a combination of such revenues. Provided, that all bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall be authorized and issued by the governing authorities of a city, town or other unit of municipal government created under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-711.
Sale or exchange by municipality of excess capacity or output.

Capacity or output or related services derived by a municipality from its ownership share of a project not then required by such municipality for its own use and for the use of its consumers may be sold or exchanged by such municipality, for such consideration and for such period and upon such other terms and conditions as may be determined by the parties, either within or without the state, to any state, federal or municipal or private agency or corporation, including joint agencies created pursuant to this article and to any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy within this state or any other state. Provided, however, that sales of excess capacity or output of a project to electric power associations, public utilities and other persons, the interest on whose securities and other obligations is not exempt from taxation by the federal government, shall not be made in such amounts, for such periods of time, and under such terms and conditions as will cause the interest on bonds issued to finance the cost of a project to become taxable by the federal government.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-713.
Application for licenses, permits, certificates or approvals.

Municipalities proposing to jointly plan, finance, develop, own and operate a project are hereby authorized, either jointly or separately, to apply to the appropriate agencies of the state, the United States, or any state thereof, and to any other proper agency for such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals as may be necessary, and to construct, maintain and operate projects in accordance with such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals and to obtain, hold and use such licenses, permits, certificates and approvals in the same manner as any other operating unit of any other person; provided, however, nothing herein contained shall be construed to require a municipality to obtain any license, certificate, permit, or approval from the public service commission of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-715.
Contracts for exchange, interchange, wheeling, pooling and transmission of electric power.

Municipalities participating in a joint project or projects are hereby authorized to enter into contracts for the exchange, interchange, wheeling, pooling and transmission of electric power and energy produced by such project or projects with any municipality of this state or any other state owning electric distribution facilities, any electric power association, or any public or private utility, or any state, federal or municipal agency which owns electric generation, transmission or distribution facilities in this state or any other state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-717.
Creation of joint agencies; application process; issuance of certificate of incorporation.

The utility commissions of two (2) or more municipalities may, by resolution or ordinance, determine that it is in the best interests of the municipalities in accomplishing the purposes of this article to create a joint agency as prescribed herein for the purpose of undertaking the planning, financing, development, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, betterment, operation and maintenance of a project or projects to supply electric power and energy for their present or future needs as an alternative or supplemental method of obtaining the benefits and assuming the responsibilities of ownership in a project. In determining whether or not the creation of a joint agency for such purpose is in the best interests of the municipalities, the utility commissions shall take into consideration, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Whether or not a separate entity may be able to finance the cost of projects in a more efficient and economical manner;

Whether or not better financial market acceptance may result if one (1) entity is responsible for issuing all of the bonds required for a project or projects in a timely and orderly manner and with a uniform credit rating instead of multiple entities issuing separate issues of bonds;

Whether or not savings and other advantages may be obtained by providing a separate entity responsible for the acquisition, construction, ownership and operation of a project or projects; and

Whether or not the existence of such a separate entity will foster the continuation of joint planning and undertaking of projects, and the resulting economies and efficiencies to be derived from such joint planning and undertaking.

If each utility commission shall determine that it is in the best interest of the municipality to create a joint agency to provide power and energy to the municipality as provided in this article, each shall adopt a resolution so finding (which need not prescribe in detail the basis for the determination) and which shall set forth the names of the municipalities which are proposed to be initial members of the joint agency. Said resolution shall be certified to the governing authorities who shall thereupon disapprove or ratify the determination of said utility commission by resolution or ordinance spread upon its official minutes. The governing authority shall cause notice of such determination to be given to the presiding officer of the utility commission of the municipality, which utility commission shall thereupon appoint in writing one (1) commissioner of the joint agency, which commissioner may, in the discretion of the utility commission be an officer or employee of the municipality.

Any two (2) or more commissioners so named may file with the secretary of state an application signed by them setting forth (i) the names of all proposed member municipalities; (ii) the name and official residence of each of the commissioners so far as known to them; (iii) a certified copy of the appointment evidencing their right to office; (iv) a statement that each utility commission of each respective municipality appointing a commissioner has made the aforesaid determination; (v) a statement that each governing authority of each respective municipality has ratified the determination of the utility commission; (vi) the desire that a joint agency be organized as a public body and a body corporate and politic under this article; and (vii) the name which is proposed for the joint agency.

The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by such commissioners before an officer or officers authorized by the laws of the state to administer and certify oaths, and shall be accompanied by a fee in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) payable to the secretary of state as a filing fee.

The secretary of state shall examine the application and, if he finds that the name proposed for the joint agency is not identical with that of any other corporation of this state or of any agency or instrumentality thereof, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, he shall receive and file it and shall record it in an appropriate book of record in his office.

When the application has been made, filed and recorded as herein provided, the joint agency shall constitute a public body and a body corporate and politic under the name proposed in the application. The secretary of state shall make and issue to the commissioners executing the application a certificate of incorporation pursuant to this article under the seal of the state, and shall record the same with the application. The certificate shall set forth the names of the member municipalities.

In any suit, action or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of, or relating to, any contract of the joint agency, the joint agency, in the absence of establishing fraud in the premises, shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this article upon proof of the issuance of the aforesaid certificate by the secretary of state. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the secretary of state, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action or proceeding, and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents thereof.

Notice of the issuance of such certificate shall be given to all of the proposed member municipalities by the secretary of state. If a commissioner of any such municipality has not signed the application to the secretary of state and such municipality does not notify the secretary of state of the appointment of a commissioner within forty (40) days after receipt of such notice, such municipality shall be deemed to have elected not to be a member of the joint agency. As soon as practicable after the expiration of such period of forty (40) days, the secretary of state shall issue a new certificate of incorporation, if necessary, setting forth the names of those municipalities which have elected to become members of the joint agency. The failure of any proposed member to become a member shall not affect the validity of the corporate existence of the joint agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 9(1), eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-719.
Additional membership in joint agencies; withdrawal from membership.

After the creation of a joint agency, any other municipality may become a member thereof upon application to such joint agency after the adoption of a resolution by the utility commission of the municipality setting forth the determination and finding prescribed in Section 75-5-717, and the adoption by the governing authorities of the municipality of a resolution or ordinance ratifying the determination of the utility commission and authorizing said municipality to participate, and with the unanimous consent of the members of the joint agency evidenced by the resolutions of their respective utility commissions. Any municipality may withdraw from a joint agency, provided, however, that all contractual rights acquired and obligations incurred while a municipality was a member shall remain in full force and effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 9(2), eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-721.
Board of commissioners of joint agency; officers; quorum; voting; expenses.

The joint agency shall consist of a board of commissioners appointed by the respective utility commissions of the municipalities which are members of the joint agency. Each municipality shall appoint one (1) commissioner who may, at the discretion of the municipality, be an officer or employee of the municipality, the appointment to be made by resolution. Each commissioner shall have not less than one (1) vote and may have in addition thereto such additional votes as the utility commissions of a majority of the municipalities which are members of the joint agency shall determine. After any initial determination of the number of additional votes which the commissioners may have has been made, such additional votes shall not thereafter be changed except by unanimous consent of the municipalities which are members of the joint agency. Each commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the utility commission by which he was appointed. Each appointed commissioner before entering upon his duties shall enter into bond with a corporate surety in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties, and shall take and subscribe to an oath before some person authorized by law to administer oaths to execute the duties of his office faithfully and impartially, and such bond and oath shall be filed with the governing authority of the appointing municipality and spread upon its minutes. The premiums on such bonds shall be paid by the joint agency.

The board of commissioners of the joint agency shall annually elect one (1) of the commissioners as chairman, another as vice chairman, and another person or persons, who may but need not be commissioners, as treasurer, secretary, and if desired, assistant secretary. The treasurer shall enter into bond with a corporate surety in such amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), as may be determined by the commissioners. The office of treasurer may be held by the secretary or assistant secretary. The board of commissioners may also appoint such additional officers as it deems necessary. The secretary or assistant secretary of the joint agency shall keep a record of the proceedings of the joint agency, and the secretary shall be the custodian of all records, books, documents and papers filed with the joint agency, the minute book or journal of the joint agency and its official seal. Either the secretary or the assistant secretary of the joint agency may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the joint agency and may give certificates under the official seal of the joint agency to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the joint agency may rely upon such certificates.

A majority of the commissioners of a joint agency then in office shall constitute a quorum. A vacancy in the board of commissioners of the joint agency shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the joint agency. Any action taken by the joint agency under the provisions of this article may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted. A majority of the votes which the commissioners present are entitled to cast shall be necessary and sufficient to take any action or to pass any resolution, provided that such commissioners present are entitled to cast a majority of the votes of all commissioners of the board.

No commissioner of a joint agency shall receive any compensation for the performance of his duties hereunder, provided, however, that each commissioner may be paid his necessary expenses incurred while engaged in the performance of such duties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 9(3) to (6), eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-723.
Board of commissioners of joint agency; executive committee.

The board of commissioners of a joint agency may create an executive committee of the board of commissioners. The board may provide for the composition of the executive committee so as to afford, in its judgment, fair representation of the member municipalities. The executive committee shall have and exercise such of the powers and authority of the board of commissioners during intervals between the board’s meetings as may be prescribed by its rules, motions or resolutions. The terms of office of the members of the executive committee and the method of filling vacancies therein shall be fixed by the rules of the board of commissioners of the joint agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-725.
Rights and powers of joint agencies.

Each joint agency shall have all of the rights and powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the rights and powers:

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of the affairs and the conduct of its business, and to prescribe rules, regulations and policies in connection with the performance of its functions and duties;

To adopt an official seal and alter the same at pleasure;

To maintain an office at such place or places as it may determine;

To sue and be sued in its own name, and to plead and be impleaded;

To receive, administer and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any gift, grant or donation of any property or money;

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift or otherwise, or to obtain options for the acquisition of, any property, real or personal, improved or unimproved, including an interest in land less than the fee thereof;

To sell, lease, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, or to grant options for any such purposes with respect to, any real or personal property or interest therein;

To pledge or assign any money, rents, charges or other revenues and any proceeds derived by the joint agency from the sales of property, insurance or condemnation awards;

To issue bonds of the joint agency for the purpose of providing funds for any of its corporate purposes;

To study, plan, finance, construct, reconstruct, acquire, improve, enlarge, extend, better, own, operate and maintain, one or more projects, either individually or jointly, with one or more municipalities in this state or any other state owning electric distribution facilities or with any political subdivision, agencies or instrumentalities of any state, or with any one or more joint agencies created pursuant to this article, or any person, firm, association or corporation, public or private, engaged in the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power and energy within this state or any other state, and to pay all or any part of the costs thereof from the proceeds of bonds of the joint agency or from any other funds made available to the joint agency;

To authorize the construction, operation or maintenance of any project or projects by any person, firm or corporation, including political subdivisions and agencies of any state, or of the United States;

To acquire by lease, purchase or otherwise an existing project or a project under construction, or any interest therein, or portion thereof;

With the unanimous consent of the member municipalities, to sell or otherwise dispose of any project or projects, or any interest therein or portion thereof. The member municipalities may enter into an agreement with the joint agency whereby certain types of property may be traded or otherwise disposed of without unanimous consent of the member municipalities;

To fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power or energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through any project;

To generate, produce, transmit, deliver, exchange, purchase or sell for resale only, electric power or energy, and to enter into contracts for any or all such purposes;

To negotiate and enter into contracts for the purchase, sale, exchange, interchange, wheeling, pooling, transmission or use of electric power and energy with any municipality in this state or any other state owning electric distribution facilities, or with any political subdivisions, agencies or instrumentalities of any other state or with other joint agencies created pursuant to this article, any electric power association, any public or private utility, and any state, federal or municipal agency which owns electric generation, transmission or distribution facilities in this state or any other state;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the joint agency under this article, including contracts with persons, firms, corporations and others;

To apply to the appropriate agencies of the state, the United States or any state thereof, and to any other proper agency for such permits, licenses, certificates or approvals as may be necessary, and to construct, maintain and operate projects in accordance with, and to obtain, hold and use, such licenses, permits, certificates or approvals in the same manner as any other person or operating unit of any other person; provided, however, nothing herein contained shall be construed to require the joint agency to obtain any permit, license, certificate or approval from the Public Service Commission of Mississippi;

To employ engineers, architects, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, financial advisors and such other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the joint agency and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the joint agency therefor;

To purchase all kinds of insurance including, but not limited to, insurance against business interruption, and/or risks of damage to property;

To purchase power and energy and related services from any source on behalf of its members and other customers and to sell the same to its members and other customers in such amounts, with such characteristics, for such periods of time and under such terms and conditions as the board of commissioners shall determine; and

To do all acts and things necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out the purposes, and to exercise the powers granted to the joint agency herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 11(1); Laws, 1979, ch. 350; Laws, 1981, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 34; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 31; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 48; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 49; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 46; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 44; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 45; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 46; Laws, 1992, ch. 491, § 48, eff from and after passage (approved May 12, 1992).